Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-308
Property within village or city; how treated.

Section 70-305 shall not be construed to grant any rights within the corporate limits of any village or city in this state.

Laws 1903, c. 117, § 1, p. 608;

R.S.1913, § 7420;

Laws 1917, c. 135, § 1, p. 320;

Laws 1921, c. 259, § 1, p. 874;

C.S.1922, § 7099;

C.S.1929, § 86-303;

Laws 1943, c. 231, § 2, p. 780;

R.S.1943, § 86-308;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-308;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 471.